Utah statutes.
54-8b-16.   Public Service Commission authority to enforce interconnection
service quality standards and interconnection agreements -- Grounds for filing
complaint.
(1)  For purposes of this section, "interconnection service quality standards"
means specific, measurable criteria that shall be applied to a
telecommunications corporation, including obligations pursuant to Section 251
of the Federal Telecommunications Act, regarding the telecommunications
corporation's provision of or request for:
(a)  interconnection services;
(b)  services for resale;
(c)  unbundled network elements; and
(d)  access to operations support systems that support those services and
elements.
(2)  To serve the public interest and to enable the development and growth of
competition within the telecommunications market in the state, the commission
shall, by order when considered necessary by the commission, enforce:
(a)  rules regarding interconnection service quality standards adopted by the
commission under authority of this chapter;
(b) a commission approved interconnection agreement pursuant to Sections 251
and 252 of the Federal Telecommunications Act; and
(c)  a statement of generally available terms under Section 252(f) of the
Federal Telecommunications Act.
(3)  An aggrieved party may file a complaint under Subsection 54-8b-2.2(1)(e)
with the commission for a violation of:
(a)  the terms of the commission's interconnection service quality rules;
(b)  the terms or conditions of an interconnection agreement;
(c)  a statement of generally available terms; or
(d)  a telecommunications corporations' obligations under the Federal
Telecommunications Act.
(4)  In a proceeding described in Subsection (3), the commission shall have
the power to enforce:
(a)  the terms of the interconnection agreement;
(b)  the commission's interconnection service quality rules;
(c)  the statement of generally available terms; or
(d)  the telecommunications corporation's obligations pursuant to the Federal
Telecommunications Act.
